Montana, session 2025, SB209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Limits of easement. An easement or restriction under this chapter may
not:
(1) prohibit or limit the activities on land currently in use, or used within the past 10 years, for
agricultural production by a producer of any agricultural and food product as defined in 81-8-701; or
(2) impose conditions requiring conversion of the land to federal administration and control.

Section 2. Section 76-6-103, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-6-103. Purposes. In accordance with the findings in 76-6-102, the legislature states that the
purposes of this chapter are to:
(1) authorize and enable public bodies and certain qualifying private organizations voluntarily to
provide for the preservation of native plants or animals, biotic communities, or geological or geographical
formations of scientific, aesthetic, or educational interest;
(2) provide for the preservation of other significant open-space land anywhere in the state either in
perpetuity or for a term of years; and
(3) encourage private participation in such a program by establishing the policy to be utilized in
determining the property tax to be levied upon on the real property which that is subject to the provisions of this
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 209

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 209.1
chapter."

Section 3. Section 76-6-104, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-6-104. Definitions. The following terms whenever used or referred to in this chapter shall have
the following meanings unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:
(1) "Comprehensive planning" means planning for development and shall include includes:
(a) preparation of general physical plans with respect to the pattern and intensity of land use and
the provision of public facilities, including transportation facilities, together with long-range fiscal plans for such
the development as a guide for long-range development;
(b) programming and financing plans for capital improvements;
(c) coordination of all related plans and planned activities at both the intragovernmental and
intergovernmental levels; and
(d) preparation of regulatory and administrative measures in support of the foregoing subsections
(1)(a) through (1)(c).
(2) "Conservation easement" means an easement or restriction for a term of years but not in
perpetuity, running with the land and assignable, whereby through which an owner of land voluntarily
relinquishes to the holder of such the easement or restriction any or all rights to construct improvements upon
on the land or to substantially alter the natural character of the land or to permit the construction of
improvements upon on the land or the substantial alteration of the natural character of the land, except as this
right is expressly reserved in the instruments evidencing the easement or restriction.
(3) "Open-space land" means any land which that is provided or preserved for:
(a) park or recreational purposes;
(b) conservation of land or other natural resources;
(c) historic or scenic purposes; or
(d) assisting in the shaping of the character, direction, and timing of community development.
(4) "Public body" means the state, counties, cities, towns, and other municipalities.
(5) "Qualified private organization" means a private organization:
(a) competent to own interests in real property;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 209

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 209.1
(b) which that qualifies and holds a general tax exemption under the federal Internal Revenue
Code, section 26 U.S.C. 501(c); and
(c) whose organizational purposes are designed to further the purposes of this chapter.
(6) "Urban area" means any area which that is urban in character, including surrounding areas
which that form an economic and socially related region, taking into consideration such factors as present and
future population trends and patterns of urban growth, location of transportation facilities and systems, and
distribution of industrial, commercial, residential, governmental, institutional, and other activities."

Section 4. Section 76-6-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-6-202. Duration of conservation easements. Conservation easements may be granted either in
perpetuity or for a term of not less than 15 years and no more than 40 years. If granted for a term of years, that
term may not be less than 15 years. An easement granted for a term of years may be renewed for a term of 15
or more years upon a new term through the execution of a new granting instrument by the parties, except that
the easement may not be in effect for more than 40 years."

Section 5. Section 76-6-203, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-6-203. Types of permissible easements. Easements Except as provided in [section 1],
easements or restrictions under this chapter may prohibit or limit any or all of the following:
(1) structures--construction or placing of buildings, camping trailers, housetrailers, mobile homes,
roads, signs, billboards or other advertising, utilities, or other structures on or above the ground;
(2) landfill--dumping or placing of soil or other substance or material as landfill or dumping or
placing of trash, waste, or unsightly or offensive materials;
(3) vegetation--removal or destruction of trees, shrubs, or other vegetation;
(4) loam, gravel, etc. and similar materials--excavation, dredging, or removal of loam, peat, gravel,
soil, rock, or other material substance;
(5) surface use--surface use except for such the purposes of permitting the land or water area to
remain predominantly in its existing condition;
(6) acts detrimental to conservation--activities detrimental to drainage, flood control, water
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 209

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 209.1
conservation, erosion control, soil conservation, or fish and wildlife habitat and preservation;
(7) subdivision of land--subdivision of land as defined in 76-3-103 and 76-3-104;
(8) other acts--other acts or uses detrimental to such the retention of land or water areas in their
existing conditions."

Section 6. Section 76-6-208, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-6-208. Taxation of property subject to conservation easement. (1) Assessments made for
taxation on property subject to a conservation easement either in perpetuity or for a term of years, where for
which a public body or a qualifying private organization holds the conservation easement, shall be determined
on the basis of the restricted purposes for which the property may be used. The minimum assessed value for
land subject to an easement conveyed under this chapter may not be less than the actual assessed value of
such that land in calendar year 1973. Any land subject to such the easement may not be classified into a class
affording a lesser assessed valuation solely by reason of the creation of the easement. The value of the interest
held by a public body or qualifying private organization shall be is exempt from property taxation.
(2) Expiration of an easement granted for a term of years shall may not result in a reassessment of
the land for property tax purposes if the easement is renewed and the granting instrument reflecting the
renewed easement is executed and properly filed not later than 15 days after the date of expiration."

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 76, chapter 6, and the provisions of Title 76, chapter 6, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Applicability. [This act] applies to conservation easements entered into
on or after October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 209